Utah statutes.
73-3-26.   Violations -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person drilling a well or wells in the state or who advertises or holds himself out as a well driller, or who follows such business, without first having obtained a license as provided by this act or who drills a well or wells after revocation or expiration of his license theretofore issued, is guilty of a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27.

(2)  Each day that a violation under Subsection (1) continues is a separate offense.



Amended by Chapter 215, 2005 General Session

